Arkansas, session 2025, HB1549.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Arkansas Cybersecurity
Act of 2025".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 25, Chapter 4, is amended to add an
additional section to read as follows:
25-4-130. State Cybersecurity Office — Duties and powers —
Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Cybersecurity":
(A) Means the practice of protecting a system, network,
device, and data from cyber threats, unauthorized access, and malicious
activities; and
(B) Involves a combination of technologies, processes,
policies, and practices designed to safeguard and ensure the confidentiality,
integrity, and availability of digital assets;
(2) "Functional report" means the practice of aligning employees
based on function, including without limitation cybersecurity function and
*LJH063*
03-11-2025 09:57:13 LJH063

As Engrossed: H2/25/25 H3/11/25 HB1549
information security function, and including without limitation the following
factors:
(A) Monitoring and responding to threats;
(B) Incident response and recovery;
(C) Vulnerability management;
(D) Security awareness training;
(E) Compliance and risk management; and
(F) Implementation and adherence to cybersecurity
governance and standards;
(3) "Information security" means a practice or system that
eliminates or reduces the risk of state information being maliciously or
improperly accessed through physical or electronic means; and
(4) "State agency" means a department, agency, division, board,
or commission within the executive branch of the state government.
(b) The State Cybersecurity Office shall:
(1) Be managed by the State Information Security Officer;
(2) Be responsible for directing and managing all functions related
to state cybersecurity and information security for each state agency;
(3) Maximize state cybersecurity resources, including without
limitation cybersecurity personnel;
(4) Establish cybersecurity governance policies, procedures, and
standards to protect state information technology systems and infrastructure,
including without limitation:
(A) Data classification and design controls;
(B) Cybersecurity and data breach notification;
(C) Detection, mitigation, and monitoring of cybersecurity
threats;
(D) A cyber assessment program and remediation actions;
(E) Cybersecurity awareness and training;
(F) Enforcement and compliance, including without
limitation:
(i) Creation of a procedure for auditing;
(ii) Implementation of a state incident response
plan and incident response team;
(iii) Coordination with state and federal agencies,
including without limitation service as the incident response coordinator;
03-11-2025 09:57:13 LJH063

As Engrossed: H2/25/25 H3/11/25 HB1549
(iv) Service as a cybersecurity resource for local,
state, and federal agencies, utilities and other service providers, academic
institutions, and nongovernmental organizations; and
(v) Audit of the compliance of each state agency
with state and federal cybersecurity governance standards, policies, and
procedures; and
(5)(A) Report the audit and enforcement findings of the State
Cybersecurity Office in a closed meeting to the Joint Committee on Advanced
Communications and Information Technology at least two (2) times per calendar
year and at the call of the chair, as appropriate.
(B) The report under subdivision (b)(5)(A) of this section
shall detail cyber assessment and remediation actions, department
noncompliance, and other cybersecurity efforts that the State Cybersecurity
Office determines are relevant.
(c) A state agency shall comply with the governance standards,
policies, and procedures established by the State Cybersecurity Office under
subdivision
(b)(4) of this section, except:
(1) The standards of a state agency may be more stringent than
the statewide minimum standards, but in no case less than the minimum
standards; and
(2) When federal standards apply that are stricter than the
statewide minimums, the federal standards shall apply.
(d) The State Information Security Officer may create a Cybersecurity
Governance Team to assist the State Cybersecurity Office in the development and
administration of the State Cybersecurity Office's cybersecurity plan,
standards, policies, and procedures.
(e)(1) Except as provided under subdivision (e)(2) of this section,
cybersecurity personnel and personnel with job functions that relate to
information security within each state agency shall functionally report to the
State Cybersecurity Office for the purpose of implementing this section.
(2) The positions, funding, and daily management of
cybersecurity personnel and personnel with job functions related to
information security under subdivision (e)(1) of this section shall remain
with each respective state agency.
(f) This section shall not be construed as requiring access to data that
03-11-2025 09:57:13 LJH063

As Engrossed: H2/25/25 H3/11/25 HB1549
is protected by state or federal law.

/s/R. Scott Richardson

































03-11-2025 09:57:13 LJH063